Maine, session 132, LD938.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3104, sub-§18 is enacted to read:
18. Local spending requirement. A household receiving food assistance through
SNAP must spend at least 10% of each monthly SNAP benefit within a 50-mile radius of
the household's declared residence. The department shall adopt rules to implement this
subsection. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined
in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §3104, sub-§19 is enacted to read:
19. Retailer requirements. In addition to the requirements established by the United
States Department of Agriculture, a retailer participating in SNAP shall ensure that at least
10% of all perishable foods in the retailer's inventory are sourced from within the State.
For the purposes of this subsection, "perishable food" means any food that may spoil or
otherwise become unfit for human consumption because of its nature, type or physical
condition. "Perishable food" includes, but is not limited to, fresh and processed meats,
poultry, seafood, dairy products, bakery products, eggs in the shells, fresh fruits and
vegetables and foods that have been packaged, refrigerated or frozen.